Utah statutes.
16-17-202.   Addresses in filings.
Whenever a provision of this chapter other than Subsection 16-17-209(1)(d)
requires that a filing state an address, the filing shall state:
(1)  an actual street address or rural route box number in this state; and
(2)  a mailing address in this state, if different from the address under
Subsection (1).
